languagetool-language-modules/eo/src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/eo/hunspell/eo.aff
# Tiu dosiero estas publikigita laŭ GPL Permesilo
# legu plu sur: http://www.gnu.org
# 
# This file is free software; you can redistribute it and/or
# modify it under the terms of the GNU General Public License
# as published by the Free Software Foundation; either version 2
# of the License, or (at your option) any later version.
# 
# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.
# 
# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
# along with this program; if not, write to the Free Software
#  Foundation, Inc., 59 Temple Place - Suite 330, Boston, MA  02111-1307, USA.

# Autoro: Artur Trzewik mail@xdobry.de 
# 2010-01
#

LANG eo_EO

SET UTF-8
FLAG UTF-8
TRY oaeinsrltkumvjdpbĉgfcĝAŭKMzNhŝSPLDUIVJOTEFHBĵĈRŜCĜZĥGĴĤŬ'-
WORDCHARS oaeinsrltkumvjdpbĉgfcĝAŭKMzNhŝSPLDUIVJOTEFHBĵĈRŜCĜZĥGĴĤŬ'-
KEY qwertyuiop|asdfghjkl|zxcvbnm

# this is not useful for OpenOffice, which has its own mechanism for treating interpunction
# D. Pelle (20130102): added BREAK rules for apostrophes/quotes.
BREAK 6
BREAK -
BREAK --
BREAK ^'
BREAK ^‘
BREAK '$
BREAK ’$

# common two-letter surrogates for the special Esperanto characters: the "h-convention" and the "x-convention"
# (this list includes "uh", which is actually not a part of the h-convention, but used (incorrectly) by some authors)
REP 14
REP ch ĉ
REP cx ĉ
REP gh ĝ
REP gx ĝ
REP hh ĥ
REP hx ĥ
REP jh ĵ
REP jx ĵ
REP sh ŝ
REP sx ŝ
REP uh ŭ
REP ux ŭ
REP au aŭ
REP eu eŭ

# some possible single-letter surrogates for the special Esperanto characters (the list does not aim to be complete)
MAP 6
MAP cčćĉ
MAP gĝ
MAP hĥ
MAP jĵ
MAP sšŝ
MAP uwùúůŭ

NEEDAFFIX X

PFX p Y 4
PFX p 0 pli .
PFX p 0 malpli .
PFX p 0 plimal .
PFX p 0 mal .

PFX m Y 3
PFX m 0 mal .
PFX m 0 ne .
PFX m 0 nemal .

PFX n Y 1
PFX n 0 ne .

SFX N Y 8
SFX N 0 o .
SFX N 0 on .
SFX N 0 oj .
SFX N 0 ojn .
SFX N 0 a .
SFX N 0 an .
SFX N 0 aj .
SFX N 0 ajn .

SFX Ñ Y 4
SFX Ñ 0 a .
SFX Ñ 0 an .
SFX Ñ 0 aj .
SFX Ñ 0 ajn .


#Nur adverbo
SFX E Y 1
SFX E 0 e .

# Adjektiva radiko

SFX A Y 25
SFX A 0 0/XmNEV .
SFX A 0 eg/XmNEV .
SFX A 0 et/XmNEV .
SFX A 0 ul/XmNE .
SFX A 0 ulin/XmNE .
SFX A 0 egul/XmNE .
SFX A 0 egulin/XmNE .
SFX A 0 etul/XmNE .
SFX A 0 etulin/XmNE .
SFX A 0 ec/XmN .
SFX A 0 egec/XmN .
SFX A 0 aĵ/XmN .
SFX A 0 egaĵ/XmN .
SFX A 0 aĵeg/XmN .
SFX A 0 etaĵ/XmN .
SFX A 0 aĵet/XmN .
SFX A 0 ig/XpV .
SFX A 0 ig/XpnN .
SFX A 0 igat/XpnNE .
SFX A 0 igot/XpnNE .
SFX A 0 igit/XpnNE .
SFX A 0 igant/XpnNE .
SFX A 0 igont/XpnNE .
SFX A 0 igint/XpnNE .
SFX A 0 igil/XpN .

# nur adjektivo kaj adverbo

SFX Å Y 1
SFX Å 0 0/XNE .

SFX O Y 2
SFX O 0 ' .
SFX O 0 0/XN .

# Verba radiko

SFX I Y 14
SFX I 0 0/XV .
SFX I 0 0/XnN .
SFX I 0 ant/XnNE .
SFX I 0 antin/XnN .
SFX I 0 ont/XnNE .
SFX I 0 ontin/XnN .
SFX I 0 int/XnNE .
SFX I 0 intin/XnN .
SFX I 0 em/XnN .
SFX I 0 emul/XnN .
SFX I 0 emulin/XnN .
SFX I 0 pov/XnN .
SFX I 0 kapabl/XnN .
SFX I 0 ad/XnN .

SFX G Y 25
SFX G 0 ig/XV .
SFX G 0 ig/XnN .
SFX G 0 igant/XnNE .
SFX G 0 igantin/XnN .
SFX G 0 igont/XnNE .
SFX G 0 igontin/XnN .
SFX G 0 igint/XnNE .
SFX G 0 igintin/XnN .
SFX G 0 igem/XnN .
SFX G 0 igemul/XnN .
SFX G 0 igemulin/XnN .
SFX G 0 igpov/XnN .
SFX G 0 igkapabl/XnN .
SFX G 0 igat/XnNE .
SFX G 0 igatin/XnN .
SFX G 0 igot/XnNE .
SFX G 0 igotin/XnN .
SFX G 0 igit/XnNE .
SFX G 0 igitin/XnN .
SFX G 0 igind/XnN .
SFX G 0 igindaĵ/XnN .
SFX G 0 igend/XnN .
SFX G 0 igendaĵ/XnN .
SFX G 0 igebl/XnN .
SFX G 0 igeblaĵ/XnN .

# ne transitiva
SFX D Y 13
SFX D 0 ad/XV .
SFX D 0 ad/XnN .
SFX D 0 adant/XnNE .
SFX D 0 adantin/XnN .
SFX D 0 adont/XnNE .
SFX D 0 adontin/XnN .
SFX D 0 adint/XnNE .
SFX D 0 adintin/XnN .
SFX D 0 adem/XnN .
SFX D 0 ademul/XnN .
SFX D 0 ademulin/XnN .
SFX D 0 adpov/XnN .
SFX D 0 adkapabl/XnN .

# transitiva ad
SFX F Y 25
SFX F 0 ad/XV .
SFX F 0 ad/XnN .
SFX F 0 adant/XnNE .
SFX F 0 adantin/XnN .
SFX F 0 adont/XnNE .
SFX F 0 adontin/XnN .
SFX F 0 adint/XnNE .
SFX F 0 adintin/XnN .
SFX F 0 adem/XnN .
SFX F 0 ademul/XnN .
SFX F 0 ademulin/XnN .
SFX F 0 adpov/XnN .
SFX F 0 adkapabl/XnN .
SFX F 0 adat/XnNE .
SFX F 0 adatin/XnN .
SFX F 0 adot/XnNE .
SFX F 0 adotin/XnN .
SFX F 0 adit/XnNE .
SFX F 0 aditin/XnN .
SFX F 0 adind/XnN .
SFX F 0 adindaĵ/XnN .
SFX F 0 adend/XnN .
SFX F 0 adendaĵ/XnN .
SFX F 0 adebl/XnN .
SFX F 0 adeblaĵ/XnN .

SFX ! Y 13
SFX ! 0 iĝ/XV .
SFX ! 0 iĝ/XnN .
SFX ! 0 iĝant/XnNE .
SFX ! 0 iĝantin/XnN .
SFX ! 0 iĝont/XnNE .
SFX ! 0 iĝontin/XnN .
SFX ! 0 iĝint/XnNE .
SFX ! 0 iĝintin/XnN .
SFX ! 0 iĝem/XnN .
SFX ! 0 iĝemul/XnN .
SFX ! 0 iĝemulin/XnN .
SFX ! 0 iĝpov/XnN .
SFX ! 0 iĝkapabl/XnN .

SFX ) Y 13
SFX ) 0 et/XV .
SFX ) 0 et/XnN .
SFX ) 0 etant/XnNE .
SFX ) 0 etantin/XnN .
SFX ) 0 etont/XnNE .
SFX ) 0 etontin/XnN .
SFX ) 0 etint/XnNE .
SFX ) 0 etintin/XnN .
SFX ) 0 etem/XnN .
SFX ) 0 etemul/XnN .
SFX ) 0 etemulin/XnN .
SFX ) 0 etpov/XnN .
SFX ) 0 etkapabl/XnN .

SFX § Y 13
SFX § 0 eg/XV .
SFX § 0 eg/XnN .
SFX § 0 egant/XnNE .
SFX § 0 egantin/XnN .
SFX § 0 egont/XnNE .
SFX § 0 egontin/XnN .
SFX § 0 egint/XnNE .
SFX § 0 egintin/XnN .
SFX § 0 egem/XnN .
SFX § 0 egemul/XnN .
SFX § 0 egemulin/XnN .
SFX § 0 egpov/XnN .
SFX § 0 egkapabl/XnN .

SFX ? Y 13
SFX ? 0 um/XV .
SFX ? 0 um/XnN .
SFX ? 0 umant/XnNE .
SFX ? 0 umantin/XnN .
SFX ? 0 umont/XnNE .
SFX ? 0 umontin/XnN .
SFX ? 0 umint/XnNE .
SFX ? 0 umintin/XnN .
SFX ? 0 umem/XnN .
SFX ? 0 umemul/XnN .
SFX ? 0 umemulin/XnN .
SFX ? 0 umpov/XnN .
SFX ? 0 umkapabl/XnN .

SFX % Y 25
SFX % 0 et/XV .
SFX % 0 et/XnN .
SFX % 0 etant/XnNE .
SFX % 0 etantin/XnN .
SFX % 0 etont/XnNE .
SFX % 0 etontin/XnN .
SFX % 0 etint/XnNE .
SFX % 0 etintin/XnN .
SFX % 0 etem/XnN .
SFX % 0 etemul/XnN .
SFX % 0 etemulin/XnN .
SFX % 0 etpov/XnN .
SFX % 0 etkapabl/XnN .
SFX % 0 etat/XnNE .
SFX % 0 etatin/XnN .
SFX % 0 etot/XnNE .
SFX % 0 etotin/XnN .
SFX % 0 etit/XnNE .
SFX % 0 etitin/XnN .
SFX % 0 etind/XnN .
SFX % 0 etindaĵ/XnN .
SFX % 0 etend/XnN .
SFX % 0 etendaĵ/XnN .
SFX % 0 etebl/XnN .
SFX % 0 eteblaĵ/XnN .

SFX & Y 25
SFX & 0 eg/XV .
SFX & 0 eg/XnN .
SFX & 0 egant/XnNE .
SFX & 0 egantin/XnN .
SFX & 0 egont/XnNE .
SFX & 0 egontin/XnN .
SFX & 0 egint/XnNE .
SFX & 0 egintin/XnN .
SFX & 0 egem/XnN .
SFX & 0 egemul/XnN .
SFX & 0 egemulin/XnN .
SFX & 0 egpov/XnN .
SFX & 0 egkapabl/XnN .
SFX & 0 egat/XnNE .
SFX & 0 egatin/XnN .
SFX & 0 egot/XnNE .
SFX & 0 egotin/XnN .
SFX & 0 egit/XnNE .
SFX & 0 egitin/XnN .
SFX & 0 egind/XnN .
SFX & 0 egindaĵ/XnN .
SFX & 0 egend/XnN .
SFX & 0 egendaĵ/XnN .
SFX & 0 egebl/XnN .
SFX & 0 egeblaĵ/XnN .

SFX ( Y 25
SFX ( 0 um/XV .
SFX ( 0 um/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umant/XnNE .
SFX ( 0 umantin/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umont/XnNE .
SFX ( 0 umontin/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umint/XnNE .
SFX ( 0 umintin/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umem/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umemul/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umemulin/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umpov/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umkapabl/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umat/XnNE .
SFX ( 0 umatin/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umot/XnNE .
SFX ( 0 umotin/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umit/XnNE .
SFX ( 0 umitin/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umind/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umindaĵ/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umend/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umendaĵ/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umebl/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umeblaĵ/XnN .

SFX À Y 13
SFX À 0 iĝad/XV .
SFX À 0 iĝad/XnN .
SFX À 0 iĝadant/XnNE .
SFX À 0 iĝadantin/XnN .
SFX À 0 iĝadont/XnNE .
SFX À 0 iĝadontin/XnN .
SFX À 0 iĝadint/XnNE .
SFX À 0 iĝadintin/XnN .
SFX À 0 iĝadem/XnN .
SFX À 0 iĝademul/XnN .
SFX À 0 iĝademulin/XnN .
SFX À 0 iĝadpov/XnN .
SFX À 0 iĝadkapabl/XnN .

SFX Â Y 13
SFX Â 0 etad/XV .
SFX Â 0 etad/XnN .
SFX Â 0 etadant/XnNE .
SFX Â 0 etadantin/XnN .
SFX Â 0 etadont/XnNE .
SFX Â 0 etadontin/XnN .
SFX Â 0 etadint/XnNE .
SFX Â 0 etadintin/XnN .
SFX Â 0 etadem/XnN .
SFX Â 0 etademul/XnN .
SFX Â 0 etademulin/XnN .
SFX Â 0 etadpov/XnN .
SFX Â 0 etadkapabl/XnN .
