languagetool-language-modules/eo/src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/eo/hunspell/eo.dic
kiaspec/XA
minjonec/XO
patrinec/XE
inic/XAITn
anonc/XIHLT%!FSGªâe
asonanc/XIG
distanc/XAI!áµ
seksatenc/XI
ekzerc/XIETRJFÀÜSGn
krad/XAITPwè
persvad/XIETF
grupigad/XO
fid/XIETĆ&FWGleæ
brid/XITÜlen
gvid/XIELTFSeæs
ekrid/XI%&F
decid/XIET!Gªyîúuar
ald/XO
fald/XAI(T!?ldúr
ond/XAI(FRÀ?deä
bind/XILTJÜSGn
tond/XILTU%!JFGtyuwè
etend/XIET!FÀÜGdt
pikvund/XIHT%
profund/XAIÀ
gratvund/XIT%
agnoskind/XE
abomenind/XA
klopod/XI!&FGer
murd/XITFS
lard/XI(T?
sentoperd/XO
aŭd/XIEÉLT!FGtąenrs
laŭd/XAIT&FKlyeæė
plaŭd/XAI!FJte
sanktole/XI(T?
ese/XIEH%RS
traf/XAIT!ls
iutag/XE
baraĵlag/XO
deleg/XITk
antaŭpordeg/XA
lig/XAITL!FKõaèdúevwîiln
sciig/XITF
esperig/XAITab
kuraĝig/XE
finhardig/XIT
surbendig/XILTÜG
dung/XIET!FSGluænr
sang/XIE(TF?Ge
esting/XILT!FÀ
dialog/XIU
plug/XILTJFSer
enflug/XIT%F
asoci/XAIT!RKõ
ekvaci/XORn
sidpozici/XO
filozofi/XIE(TÜ?
teologi/XAS
foli/XIP!T%UGÜ(HĄÃa
diskutofoli/XO
miaopini/XE
ekkri/XIT%&F
industri/XA!JSaç
ŝtatsekretari/XO
pensi/XIT!ĆG
leterkampanj/XO
roj/XIH%J
kvak/XI
ĉirkaŭbrak/XI(T?
lek/XI(TF?euè
seksvek/XA
aplik/XAIT!FÜSe
komunik/XILTJFÀÜGõ
enradik/XIT!G
praktik/XIET!ĆFÜSlen
kvalifik/XIET!Ìl
informatik/XOS
interkomunik/XILT!ÀG
kalk/XAI(TŻÌ?
mank/XAI(?lea
park/XAI(TJ
disk/XIĄH%J
nask/XIET!FÀGinrb's
task/XITR&G
krepusk/XA!å
kunkresk/XI!G
ĉibuk/XO
suprenkonduk/XIT
malgraŭk/XE
real/XA!Slnzß
enfal/XILUJF
sibl/XIE&FGteà
establ/XIT!JÜKr
neŭtrigebl/XA
cel/XAI(TPLFR?áâîeqavkµ
akcel/XIET!FGl
ĉapel/XIHLT%JSan
ŝancel/XITÀGen
pracel/XOMKq
malhel/XAI(!?
civil/XA!S
pikfosil/XOE
mortsonoril/XO
najl/XIHT%&WGlúv
onkl/XAQqgc
recikl/XIG
interpol/XITÜ
rul/XI(TFÀÜ?Gieúuvw
alrul/XIT!
asperul/XO
am/XIETQ%&ÌSKGlhõâienãg
ekam/XIT&F
inflam/XITG
balzam/XIE(TS?
flatem/XE
forprem/XIT&
decidem/XEn
batalem/XA
abonsistem/XO
ektim/XIET!&G
fantom/XAI(F?
farmdom/XIH%
realnom/XE
ferm/XIELT%ÇFÀÜGltåienrè
ekdorm/XI%G
novform/XIT
malferm/XAITL!FÀ
malvarm/XAIÉ(!Ç?
klakferm/XIT!
kugloform/XA
kokainism/XO
forum/XIH%K
plenum/XIET!FGªâîen
pren/XIHLT%FGltieúzßvrwè
tren/XIT!FÌÀÜtieúuv
reven/XIEFG
seren/XAI!l
malplen/XAI(!JÀ?
bruplen/XA
entrepren/XIHT%J&WSe
partopren/XITFÜGng
pruntopren/XIT
sign/XAI(TŁR?ªºçäàwµ
fin/XAITLFJÀtîan
limuzin/XO
kojn/XIEH(T%?
damn/XAIT
dron/XIÉ&FWG
buton/XI(T?l
bezon/XAIT&láean
disdon/XIT!JF
kamion/XOEHS
lern/XILT%FÜGærtúevgîàñlno
turn/XIELT%FÀÜGteúußrwè
forturn/XIT!F
map/XIRG
sap/XAI(TPÃ?
frap/XAITLÊ!Fdtõyeúïrb
ekfrap/XIT%!
romp/XAITFÀdtõieuaàw
jartemp/XO
flugkamp/XA
ŝtop/XIELT!Ülér
ĉirp/XIF
flar/XI(TF?ªtiyeè
klar/XAIÉ!ÀGl
prepar/XIET!FÀÜªîanr
senerar/XA!
sfer/XAå
bier/XI(J?
buter/XI(TUS?G
danĝer/XAIiaø
ekkoler/XI!&G
endanĝer/XI!G
misliter/XI(T?
ekzempler/XO
preĝmanier/XE
fingr/XAI(ĄU?zb'
tir/XIELT&Fçbrtduúevw'hxizßàª
dezir/XAIT&Fláâen
suspir/XIE&e
for/XAIÉ!ÀGw
flor/XAI(!YUFRJ?Sdéeurw
glor/XAIÉT!Flab
plor/XAIÊ&FStyeú
vapor/XAI!ée
esplor/XIET%FSGynà
lilikolor/XA
brikkolor/XE
kupr/XIP(TMÜS?
vitr/XAITPQia
kastr/XITG
elkur/XIJ&F
broŝur/XIHLT%
forkur/XI&FGe
sukersciur/XO
kovr/XI(T%!FÀÜ?léienäè
impres/XIET!ÜG
sukcespromes/XA
interkis/XIT!F
fiks/XAITL!FJlªõiúnvç
inseks/XI
kiels/XE
respons/XAIG
flos/XIHL(T%!ÜS?Gev
kolaps/XI%G
ŝat/XAIT&len
vat/XAI(T?
ĵet/XILT&FÀÜrtduúevwxyizßºä
enĵet/XIT!ª
demet/XITJF
epitet/XA
ombroĵet/XOL
evit/XIETFGl
imit/XIELTFÌÜSe
merit/XAITáénïb
profit/XIE&FGltéeúaė
nokt/XAI(!F?ªñbà
aflikt/XIT!&FW
korekt/XIELTFÜSGlnzs
kolekt/XI!STUF&WÜJÀiunvr
protekt/XIELTMJún
respekt/XAIT&leaæ
noblaspekt/XA
tumult/XAI!ºe
vent/XAI(ÃKa
pint/XAI(Ą!Ł?lab'
hont/XIET!&ÜGea
plant/XIHTY%RJFÜliyß
rakont/XIEHT%RFÜSGªyerà
kunsent/XIETG
prezent/XIT!FÀÜSGeúrs
frekvent/XITFeb
jakobiadeterminant/XO
fot/XIELT!FÜSG
frot/XI(T%!FÜS?dtõieuw
kurt/XQA
nordpart/XE
transport/XILT!ÓFSG
fast/XI(F?
ekzist/XITMFÜGeúno
impost/XIETJSGä
kolecist/XI
naturesplorist/XO
paŝt/XIT!JFÀÜS
enflu/XI%JG
genu/XIE!KGezb
ekbru/XI%&
revu/XAITì
prav/XAIÉ!ñ
dev/XAIÉT!Flá
lev/XIL(TY%FÀ?Glxteur
lingv/XAPRSKõyqanbk'ìø
arkiv/XITJÜSG
akv/XAI(TP!URJSxiazbä
mov/XILTÊ%ÇÌÀGdeuaßvrw
pov/XI(T?éea
korv/XA
kaŝobserv/XIT
esceptokaz/XE
pez/XAIL!lºáãïäė
organiz/XIET!ÜSlúnrk
kroz/XIELFS
supoz/XIEHT%Gªs
necesakondiĉ/XO
pioĉ/XIH%
suprennaĝ/XIF
finiĝ/XIF
moviĝ/XIE%Fdti
konsiliĝ/XIF
malsorbiĝ/XI
manĝ/XAITÉU%ÊF&ÌJLaçèéuúevîėàkn
aranĝ/XIT!FÀÜSGlªõâîvrì
mallarĝ/XAI!J
brunruĝ/XA
superpaŝ/XIT
tuŝ/XAITÊ%!&Fõåenvr
elpuŝ/XIT!F
kapantaŭ/XE
